Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5053YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2155 Section 1. Section 902.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 902.7 Minimum sentence ââ use of a dangerous weapon. 3 At the trial of a person charged with participating in a 4 forcible felony, if the trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 5 doubt that the person is guilty of a forcible felony and that 6 the person represented that the person was in the immediate 7 possession and control of a dangerous weapon, displayed a 8 dangerous weapon in a threatening manner, or was armed with a 9 dangerous weapon while participating in the forcible felony the 10 convicted person shall serve a minimum of five years one-half 11 of the sentence imposed by law. A person sentenced pursuant to 12 this section shall not be eligible for parole until the person 13 has served the minimum sentence of confinement imposed by this 14 section . 15 Sec. 2. Section 902.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 902.8 Minimum sentence ââ habitual offender. 18 An A habitual offender is any person convicted of a class 19 âCâ or a class âDâ felony, who has twice before been convicted 20 of any felony in a court of this or any other state, or of the 21 United States. An offense is a felony if, by the law under 22 which the person is convicted, it is so classified at the 23 time of the personâs conviction. A person sentenced as an a 24 habitual offender shall not be eligible for parole until the 25 person has served the a minimum sentence of confinement of 26 three years one-half of the sentence imposed by law . 27 Sec. 3. Section 902.8A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 902.8A Minimum sentence for conspiring to manufacture 30 amphetamine or methamphetamine for delivery , or delivery of , 31 amphetamine or methamphetamine , to a minor. 32 A person who has been convicted for a first violation under 33 section 124.401D shall not be eligible for parole until the 34 person has served a minimum term of confinement of ten years of 35 -1- LSB 5053YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2155 one-half of the sentence imposed by law . 1 Sec. 4. Section 902.12, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. A person serving a sentence for a conviction of child 4 endangerment as defined in section 726.6, subsection 1 , 5 paragraph âbâ , that is described and punishable under section 6 726.6, subsection 5 , shall be denied parole or work release 7 until the person has served between three-tenths one-half and 8 seven-tenths of the maximum term of the personâs sentence as 9 determined under section 901.11, subsection 2 . 10 Sec. 5. Section 902.13, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. A person who has been convicted of a third or subsequent 13 offense of domestic abuse assault under section 708.2A, 14 subsection 4 , shall be denied parole or work release until the 15 person has served between one-fifth one-half of the maximum 16 term and the maximum term of the personâs sentence as provided 17 in subsection 2 . 18